Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.56.050 and 2009 c 431 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of theft in the third degree if he or she commits theft of property or services which (a) does not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars in value, or (b) includes ten or more merchandise pallets, or ten or more beverage crates, or a combination of ten or more merchandise pallets and beverage crates.(2) Theft in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, theft in the third degree is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW if the person has been convicted twice or more in the past five years of any of the following crimes:(a) Theft in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.030;(b) Theft in the second degree, RCW 9A.56.040;(c) Theft in the third degree, RCW 9A.56.050;(d) Theft of a motor vehicle, RCW 9A.56.065;(e) Theft of livestock in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.080;(f) Theft of livestock in the second degree, RCW 9A.56.083;(g) Robbery in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.200;(h) Robbery in the second degree, RCW 9A.56.210;(i) Theft of a firearm, RCW 9A.56.300;(j) Theft with the intent to resell, RCW 9A.56.340;(k) Organized retail theft, RCW 9A.56.350;(l) Retail theft with special circumstances, RCW 9A.56.360;(m) Mail theft, RCW 9A.56.370; or(n) Theft from a vulnerable adult in the first or second degree, RCW 9A.56.400.Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.533 and 2024 c 301 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by seventy-five percent.(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun or bump-fire stock, possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun or bump-fire stock in a felony;(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section:(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) or (b) or 69.50.410;(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2) (c), (d), or (e);(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that facility or county jail.(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or 9.94A.827. All enhancements under this subsection shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all impaired driving enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other impaired driving enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter.An offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c).(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1, 2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both;(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both;(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (a)(i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be:(i) Granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(1)(c); or(ii) Released under the provisions of RCW 9.94A.730;(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to all felony crimes;(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced;(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before any earned early release time is credited to the offender;(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535.(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on or after July 22, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted, solicited another, or conspired to engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.(10)(a) For a person age eighteen or older convicted of any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which the person compensated, threatened, or solicited a minor in order to involve the minor in the commission of the felony offense, the standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by one hundred twenty-five percent. If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence is the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender.(b) This subsection does not apply to any criminal street gang-related felony offense for which involving a minor in the commission of the felony offense is an element of the offense.(c) The increased penalty specified in (a) of this subsection is unavailable in the event that the prosecution gives notice that it will seek an exceptional sentence based on an aggravating factor under RCW 9.94A.535.(11) An additional twelve months and one day shall be added to the standard sentence range for a conviction of attempting to elude a police vehicle as defined by RCW 46.61.024, if the conviction included a finding by special allegation of endangering one or more persons under RCW 9.94A.834.(12) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.831.(13) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.520 or for vehicular assault committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.522, or for any felony driving under the influence (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or felony physical control under the influence (RCW 46.61.504(6)) for each child passenger under the age of sixteen who is an occupant in the defendant's vehicle. These enhancements shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other minor child enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. If the addition of a minor child enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement shall be mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions.(14) An additional twelve months shall be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.832.(15) An additional 12 months may, at the discretion of the court, be added to the standard sentence range for an offense that is also a violation of RCW 9.94A.828.(16) When any person takes, damages, or destroys any property in the commission or attempted commission of theft in the first degree, RCW 9A.56.030, theft in the second degree, RCW 9A.56.040, trafficking in stolen property in the second degree, RCW 9A.82.055, trafficking in stolen property in the first degree, RCW 9A.82.050, malicious mischief in the first degree, RCW 9A.48.070, or malicious mischief in the second degree, RCW 9A.48.080, the court shall impose an additional term of confinement as follows:(a) If the loss or property value exceeds $50,000, the court shall impose an additional term of one year.(b) If the loss or property value exceeds $200,000, the court shall impose an additional term of two years.(c) If the loss or property value exceeds $1,000,000, the court shall impose an additional term of three years.(d) If the loss or property value exceeds $3,000,000, the court shall impose an additional term of four years.(e) For every additional loss or property value of $3,000,000, the court shall impose a term of one year in addition to the term specified in (d) of this subsection.(17) A person convicted of conspiracy to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance with respect to a substance that includes fentanyl, the court shall impose an additional term of confinement as follows:(a) If the substance exceeds 28.35 grams (one ounce) by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of three years.(b) If the substance exceeds 100 grams by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of five years.(c) If the substance exceeds 500 grams by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of seven years.(d) If the substance exceeds one kilogram by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of 10 years.(e) If the substance exceeds four kilograms by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of 13 years.(f) If the substance exceeds 10 kilograms by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of 16 years.(g) If the substance exceeds 20 kilograms by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of 22 years.(h) If the substance exceeds 40 kilograms by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of 25 years.(i) If the substance exceeds 80 kilograms by weight, the person shall receive an additional term of 28 years.(18) Regardless of any provisions in this section, if a person is being sentenced in adult court for a crime committed under age eighteen, the court has full discretion to depart from mandatory sentencing enhancements and to take the particular circumstances surrounding the defendant's youth into account.Sec. 3. RCW 69.50.401 and 2022 c 16 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance.(2) Any person who violates this section with respect to:(a) A controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, classified in Schedule IV, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (i) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (ii) if the crime involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine;(b) Amphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, or methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, is guilty of a class B felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than ten years, or (i) fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars if the crime involved less than two kilograms of the drug, or both such imprisonment and fine; or (ii) if the crime involved two or more kilograms of the drug, then fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for the first two kilograms and not more than fifty dollars for each gram in excess of two kilograms, or both such imprisonment and fine. Three thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended. As collected, the first three thousand dollars of the fine must be deposited with the law enforcement agency having responsibility for cleanup of laboratories, sites, or substances used in the manufacture of the methamphetamine, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. The fine moneys deposited with that law enforcement agency must be used for such clean-up cost;(c) Any other controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, except as provided in RCW 69.50.475;(d) A substance classified in Schedule IV, except flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW; or(e) A substance classified in Schedule V, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, any person who violates this section with respect to a substance containing fentanyl is guilty of a class A felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(4) The production, manufacture, processing, packaging, delivery, distribution, sale, or possession of cannabis in compliance with the terms set forth in RCW 69.50.360, 69.50.363, or 69.50.366 shall not constitute a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.(((4)))(5) The fines in this section apply to adult offenders only.Sec. 4. RCW 69.50.4013 and 2024 c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as otherwise authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to:(a) Knowingly possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice; or(b) Knowingly use a controlled substance in a public place, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice.(2)(a) Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014 or 69.50.445, a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to 180 days in jail, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine, however, if the defendant has two ((or more)) prior convictions under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section occurring after July 1, 2023, a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section is punishable by imprisonment for up to 364 days, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both such imprisonment and fine. The prosecutor is encouraged to divert such cases for assessment, treatment, or other services.(b) No person may be charged under both subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section relating to the same course of conduct.(c) In lieu of jail booking and referral to the prosecutor, law enforcement is encouraged to offer a referral to assessment and services available under RCW 10.31.110 or other program or entity responsible for receiving referrals in lieu of legal system involvement, which may include, but are not limited to, arrest and jail alternative programs established under RCW 36.28A.450, law enforcement assisted diversion programs established under RCW 71.24.589, and the recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115.(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, a person who violates subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section who has three or more prior convictions under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section occurring after July 1, 2023, shall be guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.(4)(a) The possession, by a person 21 years of age or older, of useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, or cannabis-infused products in amounts that do not exceed those set forth in RCW 69.50.360(3) is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.(b) The possession of cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products being physically transported or delivered within the state, in amounts not exceeding those that may be established under RCW 69.50.385(3), by a licensed employee of a common carrier when performing the duties authorized in accordance with RCW 69.50.382 and 69.50.385, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.(((4)))(5)(a) The delivery by a person 21 years of age or older to one or more persons 21 years of age or older, during a single 24 hour period, for noncommercial purposes and not conditioned upon or done in connection with the provision or receipt of financial consideration, of any of the following cannabis products, is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provisions of Washington state law:(i) One-half ounce of useable cannabis;(ii) Eight ounces of cannabis-infused product in solid form;(iii) 36 ounces of cannabis-infused product in liquid form unless the cannabis-infused product in liquid form is packaged in individual units containing no more than four milligrams of THC per unit;(iv) 100 milligrams of THC within a cannabis-infused product in liquid form if the product is packaged in individual units containing no more than four milligrams of THC per unit; or(v) Three and one-half grams of cannabis concentrates.(b) The act of delivering cannabis or a cannabis product as authorized under this subsection (((4)))(5) must meet one of the following requirements:(i) The delivery must be done in a location outside of the view of general public and in a nonpublic place; or(ii) The cannabis or cannabis product must be in the original packaging as purchased from the cannabis retailer.(((5)))(6) No person under 21 years of age may manufacture, sell, distribute, or knowingly possess cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or cannabis concentrates, regardless of THC concentration. This does not include qualifying patients with a valid authorization.(((6)))(7) The possession by a qualifying patient or designated provider of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or plants in accordance with chapter 69.51A RCW is not a violation of this section, this chapter, or any other provision of Washington state law.(((7)))(8) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010, but the exclusions in RCW 66.04.011 do not apply.(((8)))(9) For the purposes of this section, "use a controlled substance" means to introduce the substance into the human body by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means.--- END ---